src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! # Basque pronouns

LEXICON Pronouns

Personal ;
Demonstrative ;
Interrogative ;

LEXICON Personal

ni+Pron+Pers+Abs+Sg1:ni # ;
ni+Pron+Pers+Erg+Sg1:nik # ;
ni+Pron+Pers+Dat+Sg1:niri # ;
ni+Pron+Pers+Gen+Sg1:nire # ;
hi+Pron+Pers+Erg+Sg1:hik # ;
hi+Pron+Pers+Dat+Sg1:hiri # ;
hi+Pron+Pers+Gen+Sg1:hire # ;
zu+Pron+Pers+Abs+Sg2:zu # ;
zu+Pron+Pers+Erg+Sg2:zuk # ;
zu+Pron+Pers+Dat+Sg2:zuri # ;
zu+Pron+Pers+Gen+Sg2:zure # ;
hura+Pron+Pers+Abs+Sg3:hura # ;
hura+Pron+Pers+Erg+Sg3:harkar # ;
hura+Pron+Pers+Dat+Sg3:hari # ;
hura+Pron+Pers+Gen+Sg3:haren # ;
gu+Pron+Pers+Abs+Pl1:gu # ;
gu+Pron+Pers+Erg+Pl1:guk # ;
gu+Pron+Pers+Dat+Pl1:guri # ;
gu+Pron+Pers+Gen+Pl1:gure # ;
zuek+Pron+Pers+Abs+Pl2:zuek # ;
zuek+Pron+Pers+Erg+Pl2:zuek # ;
zuek+Pron+Pers+Dat+Pl2:zuei # ;
zuek+Pron+Pers+Gen+Pl2:zuen # ;
haiek+Pron+Pers+Abs+Pl3:haiek # ;
haiek+Pron+Pers+Erg+Pl3:haiek # ;
haiek+Pron+Pers+Dat+Pl3:haiei # ;
haiek+Pron+Pers+Gen+Pl3:haien # ;

ni+Pron+Pers+Sg1: pronloc ;
zu+Pron+Pers+Sg2: pronloc ;
hura+Pron+Pers+Sg3: pronloc ;
gu+Pron+Pers+Pl1: pronloc ;
zuek+Pron+Pers+Pl2: pronloc ;
haiek+Pron+Pers+Pl3: pronloc ;

LEXICON pronloc
+Ben:tzat # ;
+Com:kin # ;
+Ins:taz # ;


LEXICON Demonstrative 

hau+Pron+Dem+Sg+Abs:hau # ;
hori+Pron+Dem+Sg+Abs:hori # ;
hura+Pron+Dem+Sg+Abs:hura # ;
hauek+Pron+Dem+Pl+Abs:hauek # ;
horiek+Pron+Dem+Pl+Abs:horiek # ;
haiek+Pron+Dem+Pl+Abs:haiek # ;

hau+Pron+Dem+Sg+Erg:honek # ;
hori+Pron+Dem+Sg+Erg:horrek # ;
hura+Pron+Dem+Sg+Erg:hark # ;
hauek+Pron+Dem+Pl+Erg:hauek # ;
horiek+Pron+Dem+Pl+Erg:horiek # ;
haiek+Pron+Dem+Pl+Erg:haiek # ;

hau+Pron+Dem+Sg+Dat:honi # ;
hori+Pron+Dem+Sg+Dat:horri # ;
hura+Pron+Dem+Sg+Dat:hari # ;
hauek+Pron+Dem+Pl+Dat:hauei # ;
horiek+Pron+Dem+Pl+Dat:horiei # ;
haiek+Pron+Dem+Pl+Dat:haiei # ;

hau+Pron+Dem+Sg+PGen:honen # ;
hori+Pron+Dem+Sg+PGen:horren # ;
hura+Pron+Dem+Sg+PGen:haren # ;
hauek+Pron+Dem+Pl+PGen:hauen # ;
horiek+Pron+Dem+Pl+PGen:horien # ;
haiek+Pron+Dem+Pl+PGen:haien # ;

hau+Pron+Dem+Sg+Soc:honekin # ;
hori+Pron+Dem+Sg+Soc:horrekin # ;
hura+Pron+Dem+Sg+Soc:harekin # ;
hauek+Pron+Dem+Pl+Soc:hauekin # ;
horiek+Pron+Dem+Pl+Soc:horiekin # ;
haiek+Pron+Dem+Pl+Soc:haiekin # ;

hau+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ben1:honentzat # ;
hori+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ben1:horrentzat # ;
hura+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ben1:harentzat # ;
hauek+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ben1:hauentzat # ;
horiek+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ben1:horientzat # ;
haiek+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ben1:haientzat # ;


LEXICON Interrogative 

nor+Pron+Interr:nor InterrCaseBiz ;
zer+Pron+Interr:zer InterrCase ;
zein+Pron+Interr:zer InterrCase ;

LEXICON InterrCase 

InterrCaseReg ;
InterrCaseLoc ;


LEXICON InterrCaseBiz

InterrCaseReg ;
InterrCaseLocBiz ;

LEXICON InterrCaseReg 

+Sg+Abs: # ;
+Sg+Erg:k # ;
+Sg+Dat:i # ;
+Sg+BGen:en # ;
+Sg+Soz:ekin # ;
+Sg+Ben1:entzat # ;
+Sg+Ins:ez # ;

LEXICON InterrCaseLoc

+Sg+Ine:tan # ;
+Sg+Ela:tatik # ;
+Sg+Term:taraino # ;
+Sg+All:tara # ;
+Sg+LGen:eko # ;


LEXICON InterrCaseLocBiz

+Sg+Ine:engan # ;
+Sg+Ela:engandik # ;
+Sg+All:engana # ;
+Sg+Ben2:engatik # ;
